New York, session 2025-2026, A10589.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 102 of the state technology law, 2 as added by chapter 430 of the laws of 1997 and as renumbered by chapter 3 437 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as follows: 4 5. (a) The director shall appoint, in accordance with the civil 5 service law, a digital equity officer, who shall develop, oversee and 6 assist in providing statewide broadband access to rural and residential 7 areas, public schools in coordination with the department of education, 8 and small and medium businesses. 9 (b) The digital equity officer shall, in coordination with the depart- 10 ment of education, oversee and assist in providing a computer, laptop, 11 or tablet to a student enrolled in any public school in the state if 12 such student would qualify for free or reduced meals as determined by 13 the local agency. 14 6. The director may request and receive from any department, division, 15 board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state or any political 16 subdivision thereof or any public authority, staff and other assistance, 17 information, and resources as will enable the office to properly carry 18 out its functions, powers and duties. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06055-01-5